Utah statutes.
17D-1-503.   Levy to pay for general obligation bonds.
(1) (a)  If a special service district has issued general obligation bonds, or
expects to have debt service payments due on general obligation bonds during
the current year, the legislative body of the county or municipality that
created the special service district may make an annual levy of ad valorem
property taxes in order to:
(i)  pay the principal of and interest on the general obligation bonds;
(ii)  establish a sinking fund for defaults and future debt service on the
general obligation bonds; and
(iii)  establish a reserve to secure payment of the general obligation bonds.
(b)  A levy under Subsection (1)(a) is:
(i)  without limitation as to rate or amount; and
(ii)  subject to the prior approval of a majority of registered voters of the
special service district voting in an election held for that purpose.
(2) (a)  Each county or municipality that levies a tax under Subsection (1)
shall:
(i)  levy the tax as a separate and special levy for the specific purposes
stated in Subsection (1); and
(ii)  apply the proceeds from the levy solely for the purpose of paying the
principal of and interest on the general obligation bonds, even though the
proceeds may be used to establish or replenish a sinking fund under Subsection
(1)(a)(ii) or a reserve under Subsection (1)(a)(iii).
(b)  A levy under Subsection (2)(a) is not subject to a priority in favor of a
special service district obligation in existence at the time the bonds were
issued.
